Utah statutes.
11-45-201.   Energy Efficiency Fund -- Creation.
(1)  There is created a revolving loan fund known as the Energy Efficiency
Fund.
(2)  The fund shall consist of:
(a)  money appropriated to it by the Legislature;
(b)  money received for the repayment of loans made from the fund;
(c)  money made available to the state for energy efficiency from any source;
and
(d)  interest earned on the fund.
